District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.132

Rights and immunities of witnesses.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 233, ch. 269, § 132
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.132.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.33.
1973 Ed., § 29-943.